es: Bricolaje > Suministros eléctricos > Cuadros de distribución: Paneles de interruptores principales; Paneles de disyuntores de subpanel
vi: Phần cứng > Nguồn & Cấp điện > Bảng cầu dao tự động: Bảng cầu dao chính; Bảng cầu dao phụ
da: Isenkram > Eludstyr > Afbryderpaneler: Hovedafbryderpaneler; Underpanelafbryderpaneler
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Forniture elettriche > Pannelli per interruttori: Pannelli interruttori principali; Pannelli interruttori sottopannello
ko: 철물 > 전원/전기 용품 > 회로 차단기 패널: 주 차단기 패널; 하위 차단기 패널
bg-BG: Железария > Захранване и електрически консумативи > Панели за електрически прекъсвач: Главни електрически табла; Разпределителни табла
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์ที่ใช้ไฟฟ้า > แผงตัวตัดวงจร: แผงตัวตัดวงจรหลัก; แผงตัวตัดวงจรแผงย่อย
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Παροχή ρεύματος & ηλεκτρικά εξαρτήματα > Πίνακες διακοπτών κυκλώματος: Πίνακες κύριων διακοπτών; Πίνακες διακοπτών υποπίνακα
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Системы электроснабжения > Электрические распределительные щиты: Главные распределительные щиты; Распределительные щиты
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires électriques > Tableaux électriques: Tableaux électriques principaux; Sous-panneaux électriques
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Elektroinstalace > Rozvaděče: Hlavní pojistkové panely; Dílčí pojistkové panely
ro-RO: Feronerie > Articole și consumabile de alimentare și electrice > Panouri întrerupătoare: Panouri întrerupător alimentare rețea; Panouri întrerupător panouri secundare
fi: Rakentaminen > Teholähteet ja sähkötarvikkeet > Sähkötaulut: Pääkatkaisijapaneelit; Alapaneelin katkaisijapaneelit
pl: Sprzęt > Materiały elektryczne > Tablice bezpiecznikowe: Tablice z bezpiecznikiem głównym; Dodatkowe tablice bezpiecznikowe
pt-BR: Ferragens > Suprimentos elétricos > Quadros de distribuição: Quadros de distribuição principal; Quadros de distribuição de subpainel
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 电动/电气用品 > 断路器柜: 主断路器柜; 副断路器柜
hu: Hardver > Tápellátás és elektromos kellékek > Áramköri megszakítópanelek: Fő megszakítópanelek; Alpaneli megszakítópanelek
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Napajanje in električna oprema > Plošče za odklopnike: Plošče za glavne odklopnike; Plošče za pomožne odklopnike
hr-HR: Željezarija > Elektroinstalacijska oprema > Ploče prekidača: Ploče glavnih prekidača; Ploče sekundarnih prekidača
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Elektros reikmenys > Grandinės pertraukiklių skydeliai: Maitinimo tinklo pertraukiklių skydeliai; Antriniai pertraukiklių skydeliai
sk-SK: Náradie > Dodávka elektrickej energie > Panely ističa: Panely hlavného ističa; Vedľajšie panely ističa
en: Hardware > Power & Electrical Supplies > Circuit Breaker Panels: Main Breaker Panels; Sub-Panel Breaker Panels
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Elektrobedarf > Verteilerkästen: Hauptschaltertafel; Untergeordnete Schaltertafel
nb: Maskinvare > Strøm- og elektrisk utstyr > Sikringspaneler: Hovedsikringspaneler; Underpanelsikeringspaneler
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Energie- en elektriciteitsbenodigdheden > Zekeringpanelen: Hoofdzekeringpanelen; Subpaneelzekeringpanelen
sv: Metallprodukter > Eltillbehör > Säkringsskåp: Huvudströmbrytarpaneler; Underströmbrytarpaneler
ja: DIY用品 > 電力供給装置 > ブレーカーパネル: 主幹ブレーカーパネル; サブパネル ブレーカーパネル
tr: Hırdavat > Elektrik Sarf Malzemeleri > Devre Kesici Paneller: Ana Kesici Paneller; Alt Panel Kesici Paneller
pt-PT: Equipamento > Artigos de potência e alimentação elétrica > Painéis de disjuntor: Painéis de disjuntores principais; Painéis de disjuntores de painéis secundários
zh-TW: 硬體 > 供電用品 > 斷路器面板: 主要斷路器面板; 子面板斷路器面板